Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2701
Act, how cited.

Sections 38-2701 to 38-2711 shall be known and may be cited as the Perfusion Practice Act.

Laws 2007, LB236, § 8;

R.S.Supp.,2007, § 71-1,390;

Laws 2007, LB247, § 76;

Laws 2017, LB644, § 4.